Utah statutes.
41-1a-905.   Division to print mileage on certificate of title -- Exceptions
-- Owner to record mileage on application.
(1)  The division, before accepting an application for transfer of ownership
of a motor vehicle under Part 7, Transfer of Ownership, shall require the
transferee to furnish the completed odometer disclosure statement required by
Section  41-1a-902 and shall, upon the transfer of ownership, print the
mileage on the new certificate of title.
(2)  This section does not apply to motor vehicles exempted from mileage
disclosure statements under Section 41-1a-902.
(3)  The division, before accepting any application for renewal of
registration of a motor vehicle, shall require the owner to record the actual
miles on the application.
